Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2462.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6583YH (4) 91 sc/ns H.F. 2462 Section 1. Section 29A.53, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsections: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. Notwithstanding any other provision of 3 the Code, the army national guard, the air national guard, or 4 the civil air patrol shall not be released from this state into 5 active combat or into hazardous service relating to an armed 6 conflict in a foreign state pursuant to Article I, section 8, 7 clause 15, of the Constitution of the United States, unless 8 the United States has officially declared war for the express 9 purpose of repelling an invasion, suppressing an insurrection, 10 or executing the laws of the United States. 11 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. The governor shall not send the army 12 national guard, the air national guard, or the civil air patrol 13 into service in another state without the consent of the 14 governor of that state. 15 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. This section shall not be construed 16 to limit the authority of the governor to consent to the 17 deployment of troops pursuant to Tit. 32 of the United States 18 Code. 19